Utah statutes.
4-24-10.   Livestock on open range or outside enclosure to be marked or branded -- Cattle upon transfer of ownership to be marked or branded -- Exceptions.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (c), no livestock shall forage upon an open range in this state or outside an enclosure unless they bear a brand or mark recorded in accordance with this chapter.

(b)  Swine, goats, and unweaned calves or colts are not required to bear a brand or mark to forage upon open range or outside an enclosure.

(c)  Domesticated elk may not forage upon open range or outside an enclosure under any circumstances as provided in Chapter 39, Domesticated Elk Act.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), all cattle, upon sale or other transfer of ownership, shall be branded or marked with the recorded brand or mark of the new owner within 30 days after transfer of ownership.

(b)  No branding or marking, upon change of ownership, is required within the 30-day period for:

(i)  unweaned calves;

(ii)  registered or certified cattle;

(iii)  youth project calves, if the number transferred is less than five; or

(iv)  dairy cattle held on farms.



Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

